Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-217
Village; dissolution; election; form of ballot.

The form of the ballot for the question of the abolishment of incorporation of a village shall be, respectively, For abolishment of incorporation, and Against abolishment of incorporation, and the same shall be printed upon a separate ballot and shall be counted and canvassed in the same manner as other ballots voted at the election.

Laws 1885, c. 17, § 3, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 5067;

C.S.1922, § 4239;

C.S.1929, § 17-217;

R.S.1943, § 17-217;

Laws 1973, LB 559, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 81.